California, session 20252026, AB1212.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Part 14.4 (commencing with Section 53620) is added to Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:PART 14.4. University of California Faculty and Employee Housing Act of 202553620. This part may be cited as the University of California Faculty and Employee Housing Act of 2025.53621. (a) The purpose of this part is to facilitate the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and preservation of affordable rental housing for University of California faculty and employees to allow them to access and maintain housing stability.(b) A program established under this part shall be restricted to University of California faculty and employees, except that a University of California campus may allow local public employees or other members of the public to occupy housing created through this part, subject to applicable laws and regulations.(c) A University of California campus may prioritize University of California employees over local public employees or other members of the public to occupy housing.53622. As used in this part:(a) “Affordable rental housing” means a rental housing development with a majority of its rents restricted to levels that are affordable to persons and families of low or moderate income.(b) “Auxiliary enterprise” means an entity operated by, or affiliated with, the University of California that supports and enhances the instructional, research, and public service programs of the university.(c) “University of California faculty or employee” means any person employed by a University of California campus or medical center, including, but not limited to, faculty and staff.(d) “Local public employees” includes employees of a city, county, city and county, charter city, charter county, charter city and county, special district, or any combination thereof.(e) “Persons and families of low or moderate income” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50093.(f) “Rental housing development” means a structure or set of structures with common financing, ownership, and management with one or more dwelling units, including efficiency units. No more than one of the dwelling units may be occupied as a primary residence by a person or household who is the owner of the structure or structures.53623. The University of California may establish and implement programs that address the housing needs of University of California faculty or employees who face challenges in securing affordable housing. To the extent feasible, a University of California campus may establish and implement programs that, among other things, do any of the following:(a) Leverage federal, state, and local public, private, and nonprofit programs and fiscal resources available to housing developers.(b) Promote public and private partnerships.(c) Foster innovative financing opportunities.53624. This part specifically creates a state policy supporting housing for University of California faculty or employees as described in Section 42(g)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, and, further, permits the University of California and developers in receipt of local or state funds or tax credits designated for affordable rental housing to restrict occupancy to University of California faculty or employees on land owned by the Regents of the University of California or a University of California auxiliary enterprise, including permitting University of California campuses and medical centers, and developers, in receipt of tax credits designated for affordable rental housing to retain the right to prioritize and restrict occupancy on land owned by the Regents of the University of California or a University of California auxiliary enterprise to faculty or employees of the University of California, so long as that housing does not violate any other applicable laws.SEC. 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.